District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.33

Establishment of the Office of First Source Compliance.

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), the Council establishes, as of October 1, 2008, the Office of First Source Compliance, as a single administrative unit within the Department of Employment Services, to enforce, monitor, and ensure compliance with part A of this subchapter [§ 2-219.01 et seq.], by each beneficiary of government-assisted projects in the District of Columbia.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1020, 55 DCR 7598